Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.275

Alternative school start-up grants—School safety grants—Report to legislative committees.

The sum of four million dollars, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated from the general fund to the superintendent of public instruction for the biennium ending June 30, 2001, for:

(1) Alternative school start-up grants which are in addition to the grants funded in the two million dollars alternative school start-up appropriation contained in section 501(2)(l), chapter 309, Laws of 1999, and these grants shall be awarded in the same manner and for the same purposes;

(2) School safety programs for prevention and intervention. School districts may apply for and administer these grants independently or jointly with other school districts or educational service districts. The funds may be expended for proven-effective programs to improve safety in schools, including: Security assessments of school facilities; violence prevention and reporting training for staff as appropriate to the particular duties and responsibilities of the specific staff, including administrators; nonviolence and leadership training for staff and students; and school safety plans. The educational service districts and school districts may contract for any services under this subsection.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction shall report to the education committees of the house of representatives and senate on the number and types of programs administered through these grants by February 15, 2001, and February 15th of every two years thereafter.

[ 1999 sp.s. c 12 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 sp.s. c 12: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1999." [ 1999 sp.s. c 12 s 5.]